Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.395, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Eligible projects. Housing projects eligible for a grant under this section deleted text begin may bedeleted text end new text begin include:new text end new text begin (1)new text end a single-family ornew text begin anew text end multifamily housing development, deleted text begin anddeleted text end either owner-occupied or rentaldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) housing projects funded under section 462A.39; and new text end deleted text begin Housing projects eligible for a grant under this section may also bedeleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a manufactured home development qualifying for homestead treatment under section 273.124, subdivision 3a. Sec. 2. new text begin GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS; GREATER MINNESOTA HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $15,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for grants under the greater Minnesota housing infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.395. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $15,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end